Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.460

Joint park and recreation district—Population determinations.

Population determinations for the purposes of RCW 36.69.440 and 36.69.450 shall be made by the office of financial management.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 11 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 11: See note following RCW 36.69.420.